Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB2496.
hereby enacts as follows:1234567891011121314151617181920212223 Section 1. The act of July 31, 1968 (P.L.805, No.247), known as the Pennsylvania Municipalities Planning Code, is amended by adding a section to read:Section 111 . Pause on Data Center Proposals.--(a) The governing body of a municipality may adopt a resolution at a public meeting to impose a pause on the consideration of ACCEPTING NEW LAND DEVELOPMENT applications for data center developments under a land use ordinance. During the pause, the number of days provided to satisfy time limits imposed by law in review, hearing and decision on an application received after the effective date of the pause shall be suspended and tolled as of the date received and shall resume upon the expiration of the pause.(b) The duration of the pause may not exceed 180 days and shall be retroactive to the time at which the governing body of the municipality gave public notice of the meeting as required under 65 Pa.C.S. § 709(c.1) (relating to public notice). (c) A municipality may not consider an application for a data center development by changing the agenda under 65 Pa.C.S. § 712.1(e) (relating to notification of agency business required and exceptions).(d) During the pause, the municipality may adopt, amend or repeal provisions of a land use ordinance relating to data center developments in accordance with law. An application for a data center development submitted during the pause shall be subject to the land use ordinance provisions as adopted, amended or repealed by the municipality under this subsection. An application that is submitted to the municipality during the pause shall be deemed received the day after the pause ends. THE FOLLOWING APPLY DURING THE PAUSE:20260HB2496PN3727 - 2 - <--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (1) THE MUNICIPALITY MAY ADOPT, AMEND OR REPEAL PROVISIONS OF A LAND USE ORDINANCE RELATING TO DATA CENTER DEVELOPMENTS IN ACCORDANCE WITH LAW.(2) AN APPLICATION FOR A DATA CENTER DEVELOPMENT SUBMITTED DURING THE PAUSE SHALL BE SUBJECT TO THE LAND USE ORDINANCE PROVISIONS AS ADOPTED, AMENDED OR REPEALED BY THE MUNICIPALITY UNDER THIS SUBSECTION.(3) AN APPLICATION THAT IS SUBMITTED TO THE MUNICIPALITY DURING THE PAUSE SHALL BE DEEMED RECEIVED THE DAY AFTER THE PAUSE ENDS.(4) A PAUSE SHALL NOT APPLY TO SUBDIVISION AND LAND DEVELOPMENT APPLICATIONS SUBMITTED PRIOR TO THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THE PAUSE PROVIDED FOR UNDER THIS SECTION.(5) ALL APPLICATIONS SUBMITTED PRIOR TO THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF THE PAUSE SHALL CONTINUE TO BE PROCESSED AND DECIDED IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS ACT AND APPLICABLE LOCAL ORDINANCES AND ZONING LAW THAT EXISTED AT THE EXACT TIME THE APPLICATION WAS RECEIVED BY THE MUNICIPALITY.(E) A MUNICIPALITY HAVING UTILIZED THE PROCEDURES UNDER THIS SECTION TO ADOPT A PAUSE ON DATA CENTER PROPOSALS MAY NOT AGAIN UTILIZE THE SAME PROCEDURE FOR A 18-MONTH PERIOD FOLLOWING THE FORMAL EXPIRATION OR REPEAL OF THE PAUSE.(e) (F) Nothing in this section shall be construed to: (1) Preempt, supersede, limit, impair or restrict the authority of a municipality otherwise granted under this act or a home rule charter.(2) Prohibit a municipality from adopting, amending or enforcing zoning, subdivision, land development, storm water, environmental, public safety, water consumption, utility infrastructure impact, buffering, landscaping, lighting, noise, 20260HB2496PN3727 - 3 - <--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 screening, setbacks, building height or other land use regulations applicable to data centers.(3) Require a municipality to approve, or diminish the authority of a municipality to deny, a data center application that does not comply with applicable local ordinances.(f) (G) The authorization to implement a pause under this section shall not be construed as a limitation on the powers of a city of the first class or second class under any other statute or home rule charter notwithstanding the applicability of this section in every part of this Commonwealth.(g) (H) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent a municipality from utilizing the procedures for municipal curative amendments before, during or after a pause under this section.(h) (I) The intent of this section is to preserve and strengthen local decision-making authority regarding the siting and regulation of data centers and not to create any form of State preemption of municipal land use authority.(i) (J) AS USED IN THIS SECTION, THE FOLLOWING WORDS AND PHRASES SHALL HAVE THE MEANINGS GIVEN TO THEM IN THIS SUBSECTION UNLESS THE CONTEXT CLEARLY INDICATES OTHERWISE:"DATA CENTER." ALL OR PART OF A FACILITY COMPOSED OF ONE OR MORE BUSINESSES, OWNERS OR TENANTS, AND THAT:(1) IS PREDOMINANTLY USED TO HOUSE WORKING SERVERS OR SIMILAR DATA STORAGE SYSTEMS;(2) HAS AN UNINTERRUPTIBLE ENERGY SUPPLY OR GENERATOR BACKUP POWER, OR BOTH, COOLING SYSTEMS, TOWERS OR OTHER TEMPERATURE CONTROL INFRASTRUCTURE; OR(3) HAS A PEAK DEMAND OF 25 MEGAWATTS OR GREATER."Municipality." A county, city, borough, incorporated town 20260HB2496PN3727 - 4 - <--<--<--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 or township.Section 2. This act shall take effect immediately.20260HB2496PN3727 - 5 - 12